Hawaii statutes.
[§353G-18] Statutory construction. The
provisions of this chapter shall be liberally construed to effectuate its
remedial and rehabilitative purposes. [L 1998, c 152, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next